Hawaii statutes.
§441-9 Dedicated property exempt from
improvement assessment. All property dedicated to cemetery purposes
pursuant to this chapter, including roads, alleys, and walks, but excluding
property on which there are family burial plots, shall be exempt from public
improvement assessments. [L 1967, c 199, pt of §1; HRS §441-9; am L 1996, c
145, §3]

Cross References

Excise tax exemption, see §237-23.

Real property tax exemption, see §246-32.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next